Hawaii, session 2025, SB569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the island of Hawaii needs an additional advanced life support ambulance to augment the Hawaii county emergency medical services system for residents of the North Kona area. The legislature further finds that access to primary health care in North Kona is challenging for the community.  For many residents, primary care services are as many as thirty miles away.  Coupled with economic and transportation challenges, emergency medical services have become the access point for health care to many residents. The legislature further finds that resources to operate an additional ambulance will help reduce death and disability among residents and visitors on the island of Hawaii.  A timely response to a 911 call is critical to increase the likelihood of successful outcomes for injured or sick individuals.  Given the island's significant growth and aging population, an additional ambulance is needed and will be cost-effective. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys for the operation of an advanced life support ambulance to be based in the Makalei area on the island of Hawaii, including operating costs and personnel costs for state-certified emergency medical service personnel. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,750,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the operation of an additional ambulance for the island of Hawaii, to be based in Makalei. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________